Hawaii statutes.
[§658D-1] Short title. This chapter
shall be known and may be cited as the Hawaii International Arbitration,
Mediation, and Conciliation Act. [L 1988, c 186, pt of §1]

Revision Note

"Chapter" substituted for "act" pursuant
to §23G-15.

Previous
Vol13_Ch0601-0676
Next